New York, session 2025-2026, A3300.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 34 of section 1.20 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as amended by section 13 of part BBB of chapter 3 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) Sheriffs, under-sheriffs and deputy sheriffs [of counties outside 5 of New York City where such department is certified in accordance with 6 paragraph (d) of subdivision one of section eight hundred forty-six-h of 7 the executive law]; 8 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law, as 9 amended by chapter 969 of the laws of 1983, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 2. [The sheriff, undersheriff and deputy sheriffs of New York city and 12 sworn] Sworn officers of the Westchester county department of public 13 safety services appointed after January thirty-first, nineteen hundred 14 eighty-three to the title of public safety officer and who perform the 15 functions previously performed by a Westchester county deputy sheriff on 16 or prior to such date. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02920-01-5